District of Columbia statutes.
44-951.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Board” means the Board of Directors of the Not-for-Profit Hospital Corporation.

(2)

“Corporation” means the Not-for-Profit Hospital Corporation established by § 44-951.02.

(3)

“Fund” means the Not-for-Profit Hospital Corporation Fund established by § 44-951.03.

(4)

“Hospital” means:

(A)

The acute care hospital on the site;

(B)

The hospital building on the site;

(C)

All furnishings, fixtures, equipment, supplies, and related amenities located in the acute care hospital and the hospital building; and

(D)

Any other operations located within the hospital building or on the site, and contracts, leases, or other agreements related to those operations.

(5)

“Site” means the land comprised of approximately 17 acres at 1310 and 1350 Southern Avenue, S.E.

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 5112, 58 DCR 6226
Short title: Section 5111 of D.C. Law 19-21 provided that subtitle L of title V of the act may be cited as “Not-for-Profit Hospital Corporation Establishment Amendment Act of 2011”.